Maine, session 132, LD1861.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 32 MRSA §14212-A, sub-§2, ¶B, as enacted by PL 2009, c. 369, Pt. B,
§10, is amended to read:
B. Requirements for licensing, operating and inspecting schools. At a minimum, the
rules must include standards relating to educational programs, including the styling and
treatment of textured hair, instructor qualifications, school operation, academic and
student records and record keeping, health, safety and sanitation, physical facilities of
the school and off-site classrooms, payment of refunds, notices and information to be
provided to students and credit for education obtained in subjects that are considered
substantially equivalent to applied courses offered and consistent with this chapter;
Page 1 - 132LR2293(03)